src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx
astmapasijente+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:astma#pasi IJENTE_LOAN ;
bulevaarde+N+Sem/Dummytag:buleva ARDE_LOAN ;
daataskjeerme+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:daata#skje ERME_LOAN ;
demokratije+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Org:demo^krat IJE_LOAN ;
dialåågekonferanse+N+Sem/Event+Err/Orth:dialååge#konferaa ANSE_LOAN ;
digresjovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:di^gre SJOVNE2_LOAN ;
emaalje+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ema ALJE_LOAN ;
emulsjovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:emul SJOVNE3_LOAN ;
enklitikasjovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:en^klitika SJOVNE_LOAN ;
entusijaasme+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:entusi JASME_LOAN ;
faakse+N+Sem/Dummytag:fa AKSE_LOAN ;
filmprodusente+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:film#produs ENTE_LOAN ;
gardijne+N+Sem/Dummytag:gard IJNE_LOAN ;
generallöytnaante+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:general#löytna ANTE_LOAN ;
hasaarde+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hasa ARDE_LOAN ;
huvmore+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:humo UVRE_LOAN ;
hygijeene+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hygi IJEENE_LOAN ;
idijovte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:idi IJOVTE_LOAN ;
infanterije+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:infanter IJE_LOAN ;
isoterme+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:isote TERME_LOAN ;
junijovre+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:juni IJOVRE_LOAN ;
kanovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kan OVNE_LOAN ;
komedijaante+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:komedi IJANTE_LOAN ;
kompresjovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kom^pre SJOVNE2_LOAN ;
kontekste+N+Sem/Dummytag:kon^te EKSTE_LOAN ;
korrespondanse+N+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth:korre^spoda ANSE_LOAN ;
krystalle+N+Sem/Dummytag:krystall ISTE_LOAN ;
kvaaste+N+Sem/Dummytag:kva ASTE_LOAN ;
kvalifikasjovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kvalifika SJOVNE_LOAN ;
kvosijente+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kvosi IJENTE_LOAN ;
legeende+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:lege ENDE_LOAN ;
maalme+N+Sem/Dummytag:ma ALME_LOAN ;
matrijse+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:matr IJSE_LOAN ;
medaalje+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:meda ALJE_LOAN ;
mikrokontekste+N+Sem/Time:mikro#kon^te EKSTE_LOAN ;
moderatovre+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:moderato UVRE_LOAN ;
monegaaske+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:monega ASKE_LOAN ;
morfijne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:morf IJNE_LOAN ;
opinijovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:opin^i IJOVNE_LOAN ;
oveerse+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ove ERSE_LOAN ;
pedaante+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:peda ANTE_LOAN ;
pensjovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Money:pen SJOVNE3_LOAN ;
permisjovne+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Rule:permi SJOVNE2_LOAN ;
plastskjeerme+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:plast#skje ERME_LOAN ;
playstatione+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:play#stati OVNE_LOAN ;
pleonaasme+N+Sem/Dummytag:pleona ASME_LOAN ;
proverbe+N+Sem/Cat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB:pro^ve ERBE_LOAN ;
provijaante+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:provi IJANTE_LOAN ;
reglemente+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:reglem ENTE_LOAN ;
reveerse+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:reve ERSE_LOAN ;
sarkaasme+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sarka ASME_LOAN ;
seammavyörhtegsorganisasjovne+N+Sem/Org:seamma#vyörhtegs#organisa SJOVNE_LOAN ;
senijovre+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:seni IJOVRE_LOAN ;
sjampijovne+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:champi IJOVNE_LOAN ;
symbijovse+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:symbi IJOVSE_LOAN ;
tariffrevisjovne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:tariff#revi SJOVNE3_LOAN ;
telefaakse+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:telefa AKSE_LOAN ;
terme+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Cat:te TERME_LOAN ;
terramysijne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:terramys IJNE_LOAN ;
traaste+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:tra ASTE_LOAN ;
trilogije+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:trilog IJE_LOAN ;
uniforme+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:uniform ISTE_LOAN ;
vibrijovse+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:vibri IJOVSE_LOAN ;
vïerpe+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Cat+Err/Orth:ve ERBE_LOAN ;
voejemebasseenge+N+Sem/Dummytag:voejeme#basse ENGE_LOAN ;
volontrijse+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:volon^tr IJSE_LOAN ;
energijedepartemente:energije# DEPARTEMENTE_LOAN ;
kultuvredepartemente:kultuvre# DEPARTEMENTE_LOAN ;
